New York, session 2025-2026, A7238.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1229-e to read as follows: 3 § 1229-e. Prohibition of a fully concealed vehicle parked on a public 4 street. (1) For the purposes of this section, "fully concealed vehicle" 5 shall mean a vehicle covered with an opaque material where the license 6 plate, the vehicle identification number, vehicle registration and other 7 identifying information, and all windows are not visible. 8 (2) The parking or storing of a fully concealed vehicle on a public 9 street shall be strictly prohibited. 10 (3) Any vehicle parked on a public street in violation of this section 11 shall be subject to immediate impound and towing to a location where the 12 safety concerns regarding the vehicle shall be determined. 13 (4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, any 14 municipality of this state, acting through its local legislative body, 15 is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and amend local laws, rules 16 and ordinances, in accordance with the provisions of this section, in 17 order to impose a penalty for violating this section, which may include, 18 but not be limited to, the cost of towing the vehicle. 19 (5) If the vehicle and its contents are determined to be of no safety 20 threat, the vehicle shall be released subject to satisfaction of all 21 sanctions imposed by local authorities for the release of the vehicle. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08031-01-5